Tennessee, session 114, SB0385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-314, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(k) No less than once per month, the department shall utilize electronic benefit
card data to identify any recipients who have used food assistance benefits to make
purchases exclusively outside of this state for a period of ninety (90) consecutive days or
more. Within thirty (30) days of identification, the department shall send written notice to
each recipient so identified and request that the recipient provide proof of residency in
this state in order to continue to receive food assistance. If, within thirty (30) days of the
date of receipt of notice from the department, a recipient is unable to provide proof of
residency in this state or fails to respond to such notice, then the department shall
remove the recipient from enrollment in the food stamp program. Within fifteen (15)
days of removing a recipient from enrollment in the food stamp program pursuant to this
subsection (k), the department shall send notification of and reasons for a recipient's
removal to the United States attorney for the federal district where the former recipient is
believed to reside.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-317, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(c) The department shall not provide an exception under 7 U.S.C. §
2015(o)(3)(F) from work requirements unless the department has determined that the
individual is a homeless individual. For purposes of this subsection (c), an individual
SB0385
002179
- 1 -

must not be considered a homeless individual unless the department is able to verify
that:
(1) The individual has resided in a public shelter for a period of at least
thirty (30) days, based upon notarized documentation from the public shelter of
such fact; or
(2) A public shelter is not available and notarized documentation from the
applicable public housing authority attests that such individual is on a waiting list
to be admitted to an available shelter.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002179